Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
663

TORT
ACTIONS

Part I. Liability; Survival of Actions

Section

663-1 Torts, who may sue and for what

663-1.2 Tort liability for breach of contract;
punitive

damages

663-1.3 "Ad damnum" clause prohibited

663-1.4 Payment of reasonable attorney's fees and
costs in

defense of suit

663-1.5 Exception to liability

663-1.52 Exception to liability for county
lifeguard services

663-1.53 Liability for operation of a family child
care home

663-1.54 Recreational activity liability

663-1.55 Volunteer firefighters; limited liability

663-1.56 Conclusive presumptions relating to duty
of public

entities to warn of dangers at public
beach parks

663‑1.57 Owner to felon; limited liability

663-1.6 Duty to assist

663-1.7 Professional society; peer review
committee; ethics

committee; hospital or clinic quality
assurance

committee; no liability; exceptions

663-1.8 Chiropractic society; peer view committee;
no

liability; exceptions

663-1.9 Exception to liability for health care
provider,

authorized person withdrawing blood or
urine at the

direction of a police officer

663-1.95 Employers' job reference immunity

663-2 Defense of lawful detention

663-3 Death by wrongful act

663-4 Actions which survive death of wrongdoer
or other

person liable

663-5 Death of defendant, continuance of action

663-6 Death of wrongdoer or other person liable
prior to

suit, time for commencing action against
the estate

663-7 Survival of cause of action

663-8 Damages, future earnings

663-8.3 Loss or impairment of earning capacity;
damages

663-8.5 Noneconomic damages; defined

663-8.7 Limitation on pain and suffering

663-8.9 Serious emotional distress arising from
property

damage; cause of action abolished;
exception for

physical injury

663-9 Liability of animal owners

663-9.1 Exception of animal owners to civil
liability

663-9.5 Liability of firearm owners

663-10 Collateral sources; protection for liens
and rights

of subrogation

663-10.5 Government entity as a tortfeasor;
abolition of

joint and several liability

663-10.6 Exemption for providing shelter and
subsistence to

the needy

663-10.7 Exemption for providing emergency access
to land,

shelter, and subsistence during a disaster

663-10.9 Abolition of joint and several liability;
exceptions

663-10.95 Motorsports facilities; waiver of
liability

663-10.98 Design professional liability; highways

663-10.99 Trespass; limited liability of
agricultural land

owner

Part II. Uniform Contribution Among
Tortfeasors Act

663-11 Joint tortfeasors defined

663-12 Right of contribution; accrual; pro rata
share

663-13 Judgment against one tortfeasor

663-14, 15 Repealed

663-15.5 Release; joint tortfeasors; co-obligors;
good faith

settlement

663-16 Indemnity

663-17 Third-party practice; enforcement of right
to

contribution; unnamed defendants and
third-party

defendants

Part III. Advance Payments in Personal
Injury and

Property Damage Cases

663-21 Advance payments not admission

663-22 Reduction of award

663-23 Refund of payments

663-24 Effect on insurance

Part IV. Comparative Negligence

663-31 Contributory negligence no bar;
comparative

negligence; findings of fact and special
verdicts

Part V. Civil Action; Intoxication of
Persons

Under Age Twenty-One

663-41 Right of action

663-42 Subrogation claims denied

Part VI. Limitations on Public Entity
Liability in

Actions Based Upon Duty to Warn of
Natural

Conditions

663-51 Definitions

663-52 Conclusive presumptions relating to duty
of public

entities to warn of dangers on improved
public lands

Note

As to procedural statutes superseded by the rules of court,
see note preceding Title 32.

Cross References

Emergency use of private real property, see chapter 135.

Law Journals and Reviews

Products Liability in Hawaii. 14 HBJ, no. 4, at 127 (1979).

The Negligent Infliction of Mental Distress II, or "How
Far Is Too Far?". 14 HBJ, no. 4, at 151 (1979).

Hawaii's Loss of Consortium Doctrine: Our Substantive,
Relational Interest Focus. VII HBJ, no. 13, at 59 (2003).

Settling Civil Lawsuits in the Hawaii Circuit Courts. 10 HBJ,
no. 13, at 1 (2007).

Managing a Complex Construction Defect Case. 10 HBJ, no. 13,
at 133 (2007).

Tort Case Summaries. 13 HBJ, no. 13, at 1 (2009).

The Hawai‘i Law on Legal Malpractice and Liability to
Non-Clients. 13 HBJ, no. 13, at 41 (2009).

Is it the Deep Six for "Deepening Insolvency?" 13
HBJ, no. 13, at 155 (2009).

Pitfalls in the Collaboration of Attorneys and Expert
Witnesses. 13 HBJ, no. 13, at 173 (2009).

The Scope of Liability for Negligent Infliction of Emotional
Distress: Making "the Punishment Fit the Crime". 1 UH L. Rev. 1
(1979).

Torts and Workers' Compensation. 2 UH L. Rev. 209 (1979).

Tort and Insurance "Reform" in a Common
Law Court. 14 UH L. Rev. 55 (1992).

Beyond Compensation: Dealing with Accidents in the 21st
Century. (International Workshop). 15 UH L. Rev. 523 (1993).

AIDS Phobia: The Infliction of Emotional Distress and the
Fear of AIDS. 16 UH L. Rev. 143 (1994).

United States v. Burke and Internal Revenue Code Section
104(a)(2): When Will Personal Injury Damages Be Taxed? 16 UH L. Rev. 263
(1994).

Recreational Activity Liability in Hawai‘i: Are Waivers
Worth the Paper on Which They Are Written? 21 UH L. Rev. 715 (1999).

Hawai‘i's Response to Strategic Litigation Against Public
Participation and the Protection of Citizens' Right to Petition the
Government. 24 UH L. Rev. 411 (2001).

Child Pornography on the Internet: The Effect of Section 230
of the Communications Decency Act of 1996 on Tort Recovery for Victims Against
Internet Service Providers. 24 UH L. Rev. 763 (2002).

Fido Seeks Full Membership In The Family: Dismantling The
Property Classification of Companion Animals By Statute. 25 UH L. Rev. 481
(2003).

Scientific Expert Admissibility in Mold Exposure Litigation:
Establishing Reliability of Methodologies in Light of Hawai‘i's Evidentiary
Standard. 26 UH L. Rev. 99 (2003).

Don't Smile, Your Image Has Just Been Recorded on a
Camera-Phone: The Need For Privacy in the Public Sphere. 27 UH L. Rev. 377
(2005).

Global Warming: Attorneys General Declare Public Nuisance.
27 UH L. Rev. 525 (2005).

Extending Loss of Consortium to Reciprocal Beneficiaries:
Breaking the Illogical Boundary Between Severe Injury and Death in Hawai‘i Tort
Law. 28 UH L. Rev. 429 (2006).

Hawai‘i's Workers' Compensation Scheme: An Employer's
License to Kill? 29 UH L. Rev. 211 (2006).

Medical Malpractice in Hawai‘i: Tort Crisis or Crisis of
Medical Errors? 30 UH L. Rev. 167 (2007).

From Anti-Injunction to Radical Reform: Proposing a Unifying
Approach to Class-Action Adjudication. 31 UH L. Rev. 155 (2008).

Electronic Discovery: A Call for a New Rules Regime for the
Hawai‘i Courts. 32 UH L. Rev. 153 (2009).

Plausibility of Notice Pleading: Hawaii's Pleading Standards
in the Wake of Ashcroft v. Iqbal. 32 UH L. Rev. 485 (2010).

Kanahele v. Han: Economic Sufferings Legally Implies
Non-Economic Sufferings. 34 UH L. Rev. 611 (2012).

Case Notes

County fulfilled its duty of providing adequate warning of
extremely dangerous shorebreak present at beach park on date of accident. 122
F. Supp. 2d 1140 (2000).

Plaintiff's claims of neglect, abuse, and failure to provide
a safe home against care home defendants did not constitute "medical torts"
within the meaning of §671-1; thus, plaintiff was not required to submit
plaintiff's claims to a medical claims conciliation panel (MCCP) pursuant to
§§671-12 and 671-16 as a condition for plaintiff to file suit against
defendants, and the circuit court erred in dismissing plaintiff's suit based on
plaintiff's failure to submit plaintiff's claims to a MCCP. 128 H. 405 (App.),
289 P.3d 1041 (2012).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next